District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-807

Inventory of real property owned by District.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 1211, c. 449, § 6a
as added Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-96, § 4, 37 DCR 795
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 53(b), 51 DCR 881
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 2(b), 57 DCR 886

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-407.